Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 20269-606
Gross proceeds, defined.

Gross proceeds shall mean the total aggregate receipts received from the conduct of any lottery conducted by any county, city, or village without any reduction for prizes, discounts, taxes, or expenses and shall include receipts from admission costs, any consideration necessary for participation, and the value of any free tickets, games, or plays used, except that gross proceeds shall not include any admission costs collected at any location where the lottery is also available to the public free of any admission charge.

Laws 1986, LB 1027, § 177;

Laws 2023, LB775, § 7.